Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-201.03
Board of Educational Lands and Funds; branch office; establish.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall have authority to establish and maintain a branch office in the state as the board shall designate.

Laws 1961, c. 348, § 1, p. 1107.